Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2914
Domesticated cervine animal, defined.

Domesticated cervine animal means any elk, deer, or other member of the family cervidae legally obtained from a facility which has a license, permit, or registration authorizing domesticated cervine animals which has been issued by the state in which such facility is located and such animal is raised in a confined area.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 14.